Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3759
First purchaser; deduct fee; maintain records; inspection and audit; contract for collection of fee; quarterly statement; confidentiality.

(1) The first purchaser at the time of settlement shall deduct the dry bean fee and shall maintain the necessary record of the fee for each purchase of dry beans on the grain settlement form or check stub showing payment to the grower for each purchase. Such records maintained by the first purchaser shall provide the following information: (a) Name and address of the grower and seller; (b) the date of the purchase; (c) the number of hundredweight of dry beans sold; and (d) the amount of fees collected on each purchase. Such records shall be open for inspection and audit during the normal business hours observed by the purchaser. The inspection and audit shall be conducted by qualified and independent representatives authorized by the commission.

(2) The commission shall contract with an independent agency or organization to collect the fee. The first purchaser shall render and have on file with such independent collection agency by the last day of each January, April, July, and October, on forms prescribed by the commission, a statement of the number of hundredweight of dry beans purchased in Nebraska for the preceding three months. The independent collection agency shall keep first purchaser statements confidential and report only the total of all statements to the commission for the preceding three months. Purchaser records and other such statements shall be confidential and shall not be released to any person or agency, except that the Attorney General shall have access to such statements during a bona fide investigation. At the time the statement is filed, the purchaser shall pay and remit to the independent collection agency the fee as provided for in section 2-3755 for the dry beans purchased in the preceding three months.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 25.